fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Painonnosto > Painonnostolaitteiden ja kuntosalipenkkien lisätarvikkeet: Kaapelit; Kahvat; Kuntosalilaitteiden ja treenipenkkien lisäosat; Pehmusteet ja tyynyt; Varaosat ja tarvikkeet; Kuntosalilaitteiden taljapyörät; Painopakan säätötapit; Painot
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Gewichtheben > Zubehör für Krafttrainingsgeräte: Kabel; Griffe; Aufsätze für Kraftstationen & Hantelbänke; Polster & Kissen; Ersatzteile & Befestigungen; Seilzugrollen für Kraftstationen; Steckstifte für Gewichtsblöcke; Gewichte
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Styrketräning > Tillbehör till styrketräningsmaskiner och -bänkar: Kablar; Användarnamn; Maskin- och bänktillbehör; Dynor och kuddar; Reservdelar och fästelement; Blocktrissor för träningsmaskiner; Magasinsprintar; Vikter
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Levantamiento de pesas > Accesorios para máquinas de levantamiento de pesas y bancos de ejercicio: Cables; Asas; Accesorios para máquinas y bancos; Almohadillas y cojines; Piezas de repuesto y tornillería; Poleas para máquinas de levantamiento de pesas; Pasadores selectores para pilas de pesas; Pesas
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Sollevamento pesi > Accessori per panche e macchine per sollevamento pesi: Cavi; Maniglie; Attacchi per macchine e panche; Imbottiture e cuscini; Pezzi di ricambio e minuteria; Pulegge per macchine sollevamento pesi; Perni di selezione per pacco pesi; Pesi
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Άρση βαρών > Αξεσουάρ για μηχανήματα άρσης βαρών & πάγκους άσκησης: Καλώδια; Λαβές; Προσαρτήματα μηχανημάτων και πάγκων; Προστατευτικά και μαξιλάρια; Ανταλλακτικά και υλικός εξοπλισμός; Τροχαλίες μηχανημάτων άρσης βαρών; Πείροι επιλογής στοίβας βαρών; Βάρη
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Vzpieranie > Príslušenstvo k vzpieračským strojom a lavičkám: Káble; Rúčky; Príslušenstvo pre stroje a stoly; Podložky a vankúše; Náhradné diely a príslušenstvo; Vzpieračské kladkové stroje; Nastavovacie kolíky záťažového bloku; Závažia
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 舉重 > 重量訓練機/臥推椅配件: 線材; 手把; 機器與訓練椅配件; 護墊與坐墊; 替換零件與五金; 舉重機滑輪; 槓片插銷; 配重
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Posilování s činkami > Příslušenství ke vzpěracím trenažérům a lavicím: Kabely; Kliky; Nástavce ke strojům a lavicím; Polstrování a opěrky; Náhradní díly a spojovací materiál; Kladky k posilovacím strojům; Kolíky k závaží; Činky
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Halterofilismo > Acessórios para banco de exercício e máquina de halterofilismo: Cabos; Pegas para musculação; Acessórios para máquinas e bancos; Almofadas e proteções; Peças de substituição e ferragens; Roldanas para máquinas de musculação; Pinos seletores de blocos de peso; Pesos
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Dvigovanje uteži > Stroji za dvigovanje uteži in dodatki za klopi za vadbo: Kabli; Ročke; Dodatki za naprave in klopi; Oblogi in blazinice; Nadomestni deli in nastavki; Škripci za naprave za dvigovanje uteži; Izbirni zatič za sklad uteži; Uteži
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Sunkioji atletika > Sunkiosios atletikos treniruoklių ir treniruočių suoliukų priedai: Kabeliai; Rankenos; Treniruoklių ir suoliukų priedai; Pagalvėlės ir paminkštinimai; Atsarginės dalys ir tvirtinimo detalės; Svarmenų treniruoklių skriemuliai; Svorių blokų pasirinkimo kaiščiai; Svarsčiai
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ウェイトリフティング・重量挙げ > ウェイトリフティングマシン関連用品: ケーブル; ハンドル; マシン・ベンチ用アタッチメント; パッド・クッション; 交換部品・ハードウェア; ウェイトリフティングマシン用プーリー; ウェイトスタックセレクターピン; ウェイト
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Ridicare de greutăți > Accesorii pentru aparate pentru ridicat greutăți și bănci de fitness: Cabluri; Mânere; Accesorii pentru aparate și bănci de fitness; Perne și căptușeli; Piese de schimb și componente; Role pentru mașini de haltere; Pini selectori pentru stiva de greutăți; Greutăți
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Cử tạ > Phụ kiện giàn & ghế tập tạ: Dây cáp; Tay cầm; Phụ kiện gắn máy tập & ghế tập; Đệm lót & mút đệm; Phụ tùng thay thế & vật tư phần cứng; Ròng rọc máy tập tạ; Chốt tạ khối; Trọng lượng
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Vektløfting > Tilbehør til vektløftingsmaskiner og treningsbenker: Kabler; Håndtak; Tilbehør til maskiner og benker; Puter og polstring; Reservedeler og monteringsutstyr; Trinser for styrkeapparater; Magasinpinner for vektmagasiner; Vekter
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 举重 > 力量训练器械配件: 线缆; 拉手; 力量训练器与训练椅配件; 护垫与靠垫; 替换零件与五金件; 力量训练器滑轮; 配重块插销; 重量器械
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Haltérophilie > Accessoires pour machines et bancs d’haltérophilie: Câbles pour appareils électroniques; Manches; Extensions pour appareils et bancs; Coussins et rembourrages; Pièces de rechange et matériel; Poulies pour appareils de musculation; Goupilles de sélection pour colonne de poids; Poids
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Dizanje utega > Sprava za dizanje utega i pribor za klupu za vježbanje: Kabeli; Ručke; Nastavci za strojeve i klupe; Podloge i jastučići; Rezervni dijelovi i oprema; Sprave s koloturima za dizanje utega; Klinovi za odabir težine utega; Utezi
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Levantamento de peso > Acessórios para aparelhos para levantamento de peso: Cabos; Maçanetas; Acessórios para máquinas e bancos; Estofados e almofadas; Peças de reposição e ferragens; Polias para máquinas de musculação; Pinos seletores de bateria de peso; Pesos
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Súlyemelés > Súlyemelő gépek és edzőpad-kiegészítők: Kábelek; Fogantyúk; Edzőgép- és pad-kiegészítők; Párnák és szivacsok; Pótalkatrészek és szerelvények; Lapsúlyos gép csigák; Lapsúlyválasztó tüskék; Súlyok
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Vægtløftning > Vægtløftningsmaskiner – tilbehør: Kabler; Håndtag; Tilbehør til maskiner og bænke; Puder og hynder; Reservedele og hardware; Trisser til vægtløftningsmaskiner; Justeringsstifter til vægtmagasiner; Vægte
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Podnoszenie ciężarów > Akcesoria do atlasów i ławek treningowych: Kable; Uchwyty; Przystawki do maszyn i ławek; Podkładki i tapicerki; Części zamienne i osprzęt; Kółka pasowe do maszyn siłowych; Bolce do wyboru obciążenia; Ciężarki
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Ağırlık Kaldırma > Ağırlık Kaldırma Makinesi ve Egzersiz Sehpası Aksesuarları: Kablolar; Kollar; Makine ve sehpa aparatları; Pedler ve minderler; Yedek parçalar ve bağlantı elemanları; Ağırlık kaldırma makinesi makaraları; Ağırlık bloğu seçici pimleri; Ağırlıklar
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Вдигане на тежести > Аксесоари за силови уреди и фитнес лежанки: Кабели; Дръжки; Приставки за машини и пейки; Подплънки и възглавници; Резервни части и крепежни елементи; Макари за уреди за вдигане на тежести; Щифтове за фиксиране на тежести; Тежести
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ยกน้ำหนัก > อุปกรณ์เครื่องยกน้ำหนักและม้านั่งออกกำลังกาย: สายสัญญาณ; ที่จับ; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องเล่นและม้านั่ง; เบาะและแผ่นรอง; อะไหล่และฮาร์ดแวร์; รอกเครื่องยกน้ำหนัก; สลักเลือกแผ่นน้ำหนัก; ตุ้มน้ำหนัก
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 역기 운동 > 역기 운동 기구/벤치 부대용품: 케이블; 핸들; 머신 및 벤치 어태치먼트; 패드 및 쿠션; 교체 부품 및 하드웨어; 웨이트 리프팅 머신 도르래; 웨이트 스택 선택 핀; 무게추
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Тяжелая атлетика > Аксессуары для силовых тренажеров и тренировочных скамей: Тросы; Ручки; Навесное оборудование для тренажеров и скамей; Подушки и валики; Запасные части и фурнитура; Шкивы и ролики для силовых тренажеров; Фиксаторы (пины) весового стека; Грузы
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Weight Lifting > Weight Lifting Machine & Exercise Bench Accessories: Cables; Handles; Machine & Bench Attachments; Pads & Cushions; Replacement Parts & Hardware; Weight Lifting Machine Pulleys; Weight Stack Selector Pins; Weights
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Gewichtheffen > Accessoires voor krachtapparatuur en fitnessbanken: Kabels; Handvatten; Machine- en bankopzetstukken; Pads en kussens; Vervangingsonderdelen en hardware; Katrollen voor gewichthefmachines; Gewichtstapelselectorpennen; Gewichten